Illinois, session 104th, HB2650.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Unemployment Insurance Act is amended by 5changing Section 604 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 405/604)  (from Ch. 48, par. 434)7    Sec. 604. Labor dispute. An individual shall be eligible 8ineligible for benefits for any week with respect to which it 9is found that the individual's his total or partial 10unemployment is due to a stoppage of work which exists because 11of a labor dispute at the factory, establishment, or other 12premises at which he is or was last employed. The term "labor 13dispute" does not include an individual's refusal to work 14because of his employer's failure to pay accrued earned wages 15within 10 working days from the date due, or to pay any other 16uncontested accrued obligation arising out of his employment 17within 10 working days from the date due.18    For the purpose of disqualification under this Section the 19term "labor dispute" does not include a lockout by an 20employer, and no individual shall be denied benefits by reason 21of a lockout, provided that no individual shall be eligible 22for benefits during a lockout who is ineligible for benefits 23under another Section of this Act, and provided further that   HB2650- 2 -LRB104 09933 SPS 20003 b1no individual locked out by an employer shall be eligible for 2benefits for any week during which (1) the recognized or 3certified collective bargaining representative of the locked 4out employees refuses to meet under reasonable conditions with 5the employer to discuss the issues giving rise to the lockout 6or (2) there is a final adjudication under the National Labor 7Relations Act that during the period of the lockout the 8recognized or certified collective bargaining representative 9of the locked-out employees has refused to bargain in good 10faith with the employer over issues giving rise to the 11lockout, or (3) the lockout has resulted as a direct 12consequence of a violation by the recognized or certified 13collective bargaining representative of the locked out 14employees of the provisions of an existing collective 15bargaining agreement. An individual's total or partial 16unemployment resulting from any reduction in operations or 17reduction of force or layoff of employees by an employer made 18in the course of or in anticipation of collective bargaining 19negotiations between a labor organization and such employer, 20is not due to a stoppage of work which exists because of a 21labor dispute until the date of actual commencement of a 22strike or lockout.23    This Section shall not apply if it is shown that (A) the 24individual is not participating in or financing or directly 25interested in the labor dispute which caused the stoppage of 26work and (B) he does not belong to a grade or class of workers   HB2650- 3 -LRB104 09933 SPS 20003 b1of which immediately before the commencement of the stoppage 2there were members employed at the premises at which the 3stoppage occurs, any of whom are participating in or financing 4or directly interested in the dispute; provided, that a 5lockout by the employer or an individual's failure to cross a 6picket line at such factory, establishment, or other premises 7shall not, in itself, be deemed to be participation by him in 8the labor dispute. If in any case, separate branches of work 9which are commonly conducted as separate businesses in 10separate premises are conducted in separate departments of the 11same premises, each such department shall, for the purpose of 12this Section, be deemed to be a separate factory, 13establishment, or other premises.14    Whenever any claim involves the provisions of this 15Section, the claims adjudicator referred to in Section 702 16shall make a separate determination as to the eligibility or 17ineligibility of the claimant with respect to the provisions 18of this Section. This separate determination may be appealed 19to the Director in the manner prescribed by Section 800. 20(Source: P.A. 93-1088, eff. 1-1-06.)